Alaska, session 34, HB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.17 is amended by adding a new section to article 2 to read: 05 Sec. 14.17.530. Determination of local contribution made by a city or 06 borough school district. For purposes of calculating a local contribution made by a 07 city or borough school district, the local school board of the district shall define the 08 terms "student transportation," "nutrition services," "food services," "preschool, pre- 09 kindergarten, or other early education program," "career and technical education," 10 "before-school program," "after-school program," and "student activity." 11 * Sec. 2. AS 14.17.990(6) is amended to read: 12 (6) "local contribution" 13 (A) means appropriations and the value of in-kind services 14 made by a district; 01 (B) does not include appropriations or the value of in-kind 02 services made by a district for student transportation, nutrition services, 03 food services, a preschool, pre-kindergarten, or other early education 04 program, career and technical education, a before-school program, an 05 after-school program, or a student activity; 06 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.